Massachusetts, session 194th, S2529.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. To provide for supplementing certain items in the general appropriation act
2 and other appropriation acts for fiscal year 2025, the sums set forth in section 2 are hereby
3 appropriated from the General Fund unless specifically designated otherwise in this act or in
4 those appropriation acts, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this
5 act or in those appropriation acts, and subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public
6 funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. These sums shall be in addition to any amounts
7 previously appropriated and made available for the purposes of those items. These sums shall be
8 made available through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
9 SECTION 2.
1 of 32

10 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF VETERANS’ SERVICES
11 1410-0400 Veterans’ Benefits ……….………………………………….$5,800,000
12 OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER
13 1599-3384 Settlements and Judgments ……..….…………………….$28,917,460
14 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
15 1595-1068 Medical Assistance Trust Fund……………………..…….$134,498,420
16 Department of Public Health
17 4513-1012 Women Infants and Children Program Manufacturer Rebates…$400,000
18 4590-0912 Western Massachusetts Hospital Retained Revenue………….$1,200,000
19 Executive Office of Aging and Independence
20 9110-1630 Home Care Services…………………………………………...$60,000,000
21 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES
22 Office of the Secretary of Housing and Livable Communities
23 7004-9316 Residential Assistance for Families in Transition………….$42,910,506
24 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY
25 State Police
26 8100-0006 Private Detail Retained Revenue……………………………..$7,750,000
2 of 32

27 8100-1004 State Police Crime Laboratory………………………………..$4,193,083
28 Military Division
29 8700-0001 Military Division…………………………………………$593,539
30 SECTION 2A. To provide for certain unanticipated obligations of the commonwealth, to
31 provide for an alteration of purpose for current appropriations, and to meet certain requirements
32 of law, the sums set forth in this section are hereby appropriated from the General Fund or the
33 Transitional Escrow Fund established in section 16 of chapter 76 of the acts of 2021, as amended
34 by section 4 of chapter 98 of the acts of 2022, unless specifically designated otherwise in this
35 section, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this section, and
36 subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30,
37 2025. Except as otherwise stated, these sums shall be made available through the fiscal year
38 ending June 30, 2026.
39 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
40 Office of the Secretary
41 4000-1202 For the distribution of funds for fiscally strained hospitals; provided, that
42 notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive office of health and
43 human services shall direct payments to eligible acute care hospitals in the form of enhanced
44 Medicaid payments, supplemental payments or other appropriate mechanisms; provided further,
45 that not less than $75,000,000 shall be distributed to eligible acute care hospitals licensed under
46 section 51 of chapter 111 of the General Laws that have: (i) a public payer mix greater than 75
47 per cent, as calculated by the center for health information and analysis according to hospital
3 of 32

48 fiscal year 2023 data published in its Massachusetts Acute Hospital Profiles Databook; (ii) a
49 statewide relative price less than 1.0, as calculated by the center for health information and
50 analysis according to calendar year 2022 data published in its Relative Price and Provider Price
51 Variation Databook; and (iii) a negative operating margin, as calculated by the center for health
52 information and analysis according to hospital fiscal year 2023 data published in its
53 Massachusetts Acute Hospital Profiles Databook; provided further, that not less than
54 $50,000,000 shall be distributed to eligible acute care hospitals licensed under said section 51 of
55 said chapter 111 that have: (a) a public payer mix greater than 63 per cent and not more than 75
56 per cent, as calculated by the center for health information and analysis according to hospital
57 fiscal year 2023 data published in its Massachusetts Acute Hospital Profiles Databook; (b) a
58 statewide relative price less than 1.0, as calculated by the center for health information and
59 analysis according to calendar year 2022 data published in its Relative Price and Provider Price
60 Variation Databook; and (c) a negative operating margin, as calculated by the center for health
61 information and analysis according to hospital fiscal year 2023 data published in its
62 Massachusetts Acute Hospital Profiles Databook; provided further, that not less than
63 $30,000,000 shall be distributed to eligible acute care hospitals licensed under said section 51 of
64 said chapter 111 that: (1) have a public payer mix greater than 63 per cent, as calculated by the
65 center for health information and analysis according to hospital fiscal year 2023 data published
66 in its Massachusetts Acute Hospital Profiles Databook; (2) have a statewide relative price less
67 than 1.0, as calculated by the center for health information and analysis according to calendar
68 year 2022 data published in its Relative Price and Provider Price Variation Databook; and (3) are
69 not otherwise eligible for funding pursuant to the prior provisos; provided further, that not less
70 than $19,000,000 shall be distributed to eligible acute care hospitals licensed under said section
4 of 32

71 51 of said chapter 111 that: (A) have a public payer mix greater than 63 per cent, as calculated by
72 the center for health information and analysis according to hospital fiscal year 2023 data
73 published in its Massachusetts Acute Hospital Profiles Databook; and (B) are not otherwise
74 eligible for funding under this item pursuant to prior provisos; provided further, that the total
75 payment amount to each eligible acute care hospital under this item shall be calculated based on
76 the total amount available for the group of eligible acute care hospitals multiplied by a fraction,
77 the numerator of which is the acute care hospital’s Medicaid gross patient service revenue as
78 calculated by the center for health information and analysis according to hospital fiscal year 2023
79 data published in its Massachusetts Acute Hospital Profiles Databook and the denominator of
80 which is the total amount of Medicaid gross patient service revenue for the group of acute care
81 hospitals eligible for said amount available as calculated by the center for health information and
82 analysis according to hospital fiscal year 2023 data published in its Massachusetts Acute
83 Hospital Profiles Databook; provided further, that said payments shall not be used in subsequent
84 years by the executive office to calculate any other payment to eligible acute care hospitals;
85 provided further, that said payments shall not offset existing Medicaid or other state payments
86 which an eligible acute care hospital may be qualified to receive; provided further, that the
87 secretary of health and human services may require as a condition of receiving payment under
88 this item any reasonable condition of payment that the secretary determines necessary to ensure
89 the availability, to the extent possible, of federal financial participation for the payments, and the
90 executive office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify amounts for payment in
91 anticipation of expected receipt of federal financial participation for the payments; provided
92 further, that the executive office may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this
93 item; provided further, that not later than March 2, 2026, the executive office shall submit a
5 of 32

94 report to the joint committee on health care financing and the house and senate committees on
95 ways and means detailing: (I) the schedule of payments to hospitals under this item delineated by
96 acute care hospital, hospital system and payment amount; and (II) each hospital’s intended use of
97 funds provided under this item; and provided further, that eligible acute care hospitals shall
98 provide the executive office with information necessary for the report……………$174,000,000
99 4000-1998 For the distribution of funds for fiscally strained community health
100 centers; provided, that for the purposes of this item, “eligible community health center” shall be
101 defined as any entity receiving funding pursuant to 42 U.S.C. section 254b that demonstrates
102 significant financial need based on criteria established by the secretary of health and human
103 services in consultation with The Massachusetts League of Community Health Centers, Inc.;
104 provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive
105 office of health and human services shall direct payments to eligible community health centers in
106 the form of enhanced Medicaid payments, supplemental payments or other appropriate
107 mechanisms; provided further, that said payments shall not be used in subsequent years by the
108 executive office to calculate any other payment to eligible community health centers; provided
109 further, that such payments shall not offset existing Medicaid or other state payments which an
110 eligible community health center may be qualified to receive; provided further, that the secretary
111 may require as a condition of receiving payment any such reasonable condition of payment that
112 the secretary determines necessary to ensure the availability, to the extent possible, of federal
113 financial participation for the payments and the executive office may incur expenses and the
114 comptroller may certify amounts for payment in anticipation of expected receipt of federal
115 financial participation for the payments; and provided further, that the executive office may
116 promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this item……………………$35,000,000
6 of 32

117 Department of Transitional Assistance
118 4400-1033 For the costs associated with the transition to chipped electronic benefits
119 transfer cards by the department of transitional assistance; provided, that at the direction of the
120 commissioner of transitional assistance, funds may be transferred from this item to item 4400-
121 1000 of section 2 of the general appropriations act for fiscal years 2025, 2026 or 2027; provided
122 further, that any unexpended funds available after the completion of the transition to chipped
123 electronic benefits transfer cards shall be expended on reimbursements to clients who have had
124 their federal supplemental nutrition assistance program payments stolen through electronic
125 benefit transfer card skimming, card cloning or other similar fraudulent electronically-based
126 method; and provided further, that funds appropriated in this item shall be made available for
127 these purposes through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027…………………………$15,500,000
128 Department of Public Health
129 4510-0794 For grants to reimburse municipalities for extraordinary emergency
130 medical service costs; provided, that funds in this item shall be administered by the department
131 of public health and shall be reimbursed based on eligibility criteria established by the
132 department; provided further, that not less than $5,000,000 shall be distributed as grants to the
133 fire departments in the towns of Ashby, Ayer, Boxborough, Groton, Harvard, Littleton,
134 Lunenburg, Pepperell, Shirley, Townsend, Westford, the city of Leominster and the Devens fire
135 department established pursuant to chapter 498 of the acts of 1993; provided further, that said
136 funds shall be distributed based on criteria established by the department that shall consider the
137 following: (i) the proportional share of emergency medical call volume among the departments
138 eligible for these funds; (ii) the increased distance travelled to the nearest emergency department
7 of 32

139 caused by the closure of Nashoba Valley Medical Center; and (iii) increased overtime costs
140 incurred by the departments eligible for these funds; provided further, that not later than
141 December 13, 2025, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
142 ways and means which shall include, but shall not be limited to, the expenditures and planned
143 expenditures from this item delineated by recipient; and provided further, that funds in this item
144 shall be made available until June 30, 2027………………...…………………..$10,000,000
145 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES
146 Office of the Secretary of Housing and Livable Communities
147 1595-1779 For a transfer to the Fair Housing Fund established in section 2JJJJJJ of
148 chapter 29 of the General Laws…………………………………$1,000,000
149 SECTION 3. Section 65 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
150 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
151 There shall be a Senate Artistic Upgrade and Representation Fund, which shall be used,
152 without further appropriation, for purposes, including, but not limited to, upgrading and restoring
153 historical and artistic qualities of quarters in the state house used by the members of the senate
154 and its employees. The chief financial officer of the senate shall administer the fund. The fund
155 shall consist of appropriations authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be
156 credited to the fund; provided, however, that items authorized to be transferred under section 7M
157 of chapter 29 may be transferred to the fund by the chief financial officer of the senate. The fund
158 shall not be subject to section 13A of said chapter 29 and any unexpended balance in the fund at
159 the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure
8 of 32

160 in subsequent fiscal years. An accounting of all fund activity shall be reported in the annual
161 fiscal year audit conducted pursuant to applicable senate rules.
162 SECTION 4. Section 40 of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
163 amended by striking out subsection (d) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
164 (d) The boards of trustees for each state-operated veterans’ home may receive donations
165 to benefit state-operated veterans’ homes and the state treasurer shall receive, deposit and invest
166 all such donations. The trustees may expend the donated funds for the direct benefit of the
167 veterans who reside in the state-operated veterans’ homes, acting as fiduciaries with the care,
168 skill and diligence that a prudent person would use.
169 SECTION 5. Section 61 of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
170 amended by striking out, in line 132, the words “March 15” and inserting in place thereof the
171 following words:- June 1.
172 SECTION 6. Paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of section 13V of chapter 23A of the
173 General Laws, as inserted by section 42 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
174 striking out the words “15 members: 3 past or current members of the house of representatives, 2
175 of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and 1 of whom shall
176 be appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; 3 past or current members of
177 the senate, 2” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- members: 4 past or current
178 members of the house of representatives, 3 of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the
179 house of representatives and 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader of the house of
180 representatives; 4 past or current members of the senate, 3.
9 of 32

181 SECTION 7. Section 16 of chapter 23D of the General Laws is hereby amended by
182 striking out, in line 2, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, the words “Growth Capital
183 Corporation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Development Finance Agency
184 SECTION 8. Section 1 of chapter 23G of the General Laws is hereby amended by
185 striking out the definition of “Massachusetts Growth Capital Corporation”, inserted by section 51
186 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, and inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
187 “Massachusetts Growth Capital Corporation”, the Massachusetts Growth Capital
188 Corporation, the power, functions, assets and liabilities of which have been merged into the
189 Massachusetts Development Finance Agency.
190 SECTION 9. Subsection (l) of section 2 of said chapter 23G, as most recently amended
191 by section 55 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out the
192 first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- The agency shall be the
193 successor to the Massachusetts Growth Capital Corporation.
194 SECTION 10. Said section 2 of said chapter 23G, as so amended, is hereby further
195 amended by striking out subsection (m).
196 SECTION 11. Section 3 of said chapter 23G is hereby further amended by striking out
197 clause (36), as appearing in section 56 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, and inserting in place
198 thereof the following clause:-
199 (36) to borrow money by the issuance of debt obligations whether tax exempt or taxable
200 and secure such obligations by the pledge of its revenues or the revenues, mortgages and notes of
201 others;
10 of 32

202 SECTION 12. Said section 3 of said chapter 23G is hereby further amended by striking
203 out, in line 236, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, the words “, to administer trusts”.
204 SECTION 13. Section 8 of said chapter 23G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
205 inserting after the word “directors”, in line 134, the following words:- or a duly authorized
206 committee of the board.
207 SECTION 14. Section 29A of said chapter 23G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
208 striking out, in line 221, the words “convene on a monthly basis in order to”.
209 SECTION 15. Subsection (b) of section 48 of said chapter 23G, as added by section 58 of
210 chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, the word “corporation”, the
211 first time it appears, and inserting in place thereof the following word:- agency.
212 SECTION 16. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
213 section 2JJJJJJ the following section:-
214 Section 2KKKKKK. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
215 commonwealth a separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Office of the
216 Inspector General Recovery Fund, which shall be administered by the inspector general. The
217 fund shall be credited with any money payable to the inspector general from civil recoveries,
218 settlement funds or recoupment of administrative and investigatory costs and any interest earned
219 from money in the fund.
220 (b) Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, for the
221 office of the inspector general’s operational, administrative and investigatory purposes.
11 of 32

222 (c) The unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the
223 General Fund and shall be available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure
224 made from the fund shall cause the fund to be in deficit at any point.
225 SECTION 17. Section 39M of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
226 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 21, 54, 57, 63, 66 and 154, the figure
227 “$50,000” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $75,000.
228 SECTION 18. Said section 39M of said chapter 30, as so appearing, is hereby further
229 amended by striking out, in line 67, the figure “$150,000” and inserting in place thereof the
230 following figure:- $250,000.
231 SECTION 19. Section 39R of said chapter 30, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
232 striking out, in lines 10 and 17, the words “one hundred thousand dollars” and inserting in place
233 thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $250,000.
234 SECTION 20. The definition of “Public service corporation” in section 1A of chapter
235 40A of the General Laws, inserted by section 36 of chapter 239 of the acts of 2024, is hereby
236 amended by striking out the words “facilities including pipelines” and inserting in place thereof
237 the following words:- facilities, including pipelines.
238 SECTION 21. Section 64A of chapter 60 of the General Laws, as inserted by section 93
239 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the figure “14” and
240 inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 30.
12 of 32

241 SECTION 22. Section 68 of said chapter 60, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
242 hereby amended by striking out, in line 9, the word “sixteen” and inserting in place thereof the
243 following figure:- 8.
244 SECTION 23. Section 7I of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
245 amended by inserting after the word “vehicles”, in line 8, the following words:- and vehicles
246 operated by the Massachusetts emergency management agency.
247 SECTION 24. Section 1 of chapter 90F of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
248 amended by striking out, in line 65, the words “(49 App. USC 1801 et seq.) and” and inserting in
249 place thereof the following words:- , 49 U.S.C. 5101 et seq., and.
250 SECTION 25. Section 4 of said chapter 90F, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
251 striking out, in line 17, the words “of from $2,750 to $11,000 inclusive” and inserting in place
252 thereof the following words:- pursuant to subsection (b)(2) of Appendix B to 49 C.F.R. 386.
253 SECTION 26. Said section 4 of said chapter 90F, as so appearing, is hereby further
254 amended by striking out, in lines 22 and 23, the words “of not more than $10,000” and inserting
255 in place thereof the following words:- pursuant to subsection (b)(3) of Appendix B to 49 C.F.R.
256 386.
257 SECTION 27. Section 9 of said chapter 90F is hereby amended by striking out paragraph
258 (D), as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
259 (D) Any person shall be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for life
260 for: (i) using a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of any felony involving the
261 manufacture, distribution or dispensing of a controlled substance or possession with intent to
13 of 32

262 manufacture, distribute or dispense a controlled substance; or (ii) using a commercial motor
263 vehicle in the commission of any felony involving trafficking in persons or organs as prohibited
264 by sections 50, 51 or 53 of chapter 265 or any felony involving an act or practice of severe forms
265 of trafficking in persons, as defined in 22 U.S.C. 7102(11).
266 SECTION 28. Said section 9 of said chapter 90F is hereby further amended by striking
267 out, in lines 66 and 67, as so appearing, the words “of not less than $1,100 and not more than
268 $2,750” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- pursuant to subsection (b)(1) of
269 Appendix B to 49 C.F.R. 386.
270 SECTION 29. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
271 following section:-
272 Section 249. (a) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 1 of chapter
273 94C shall apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
274 (b) At the commissioner’s discretion, the department may authorize a pharmacy operated
275 by the department to distribute controlled substances to health care providers and entities legally
276 authorized to administer, possess, distribute, deliver or dispense controlled substances for the
277 benefit of any person, whether or not the person is under the custody, care or supervision of an
278 agency of the commonwealth and in accordance with applicable law, including, but not limited
279 to, applicable controlled substances registration requirements; provided, however, that such
280 controlled substances shall be: (i) related to the provision of reproductive health care services, as
281 defined in section 11I½ of chapter 12; or (ii) distributed to ensure access to controlled substances
282 needed to provide treatment in the event of a public health emergency declared pursuant to
283 section 2A of chapter 17; and provided further, that in exercising the authority granted under this
14 of 32

284 section, the department shall be exempt from obtaining a pharmacy license in accordance with
285 section 39 of chapter 112.
286 SECTION 30. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
287 section 6, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following
288 section:-
289 Section 6. (a) There shall be a MassHealth program advisory committee to advise the
290 executive office on matters of concern related to policy development and matters related to
291 effective program administration. The assistant secretary for MassHealth or a designee shall
292 select members for the advisory committee on a rotating and continuous basis in such numbers
293 and for such terms as the executive office deems appropriate.
294 (b) The MassHealth program advisory committee shall include at a minimum: (i) 1
295 member of the MassHealth member advisory committee; (ii) 1 member of a state or local
296 consumer group or other community-based organization that represents the interests of, or
297 provides direct services to, MassHealth beneficiaries; (iii) 1 clinical provider or administrator
298 who is familiar with the health and social needs of MassHealth beneficiaries and with the
299 resources available and required for their care, including, but not limited to, providers or
300 administrators of primary care, specialty care and long-term care; (iv) as applicable, 1 member of
301 a Medicaid-participating managed care entity, including, but not limited to, managed care
302 organizations, accountable care partnership plans, primary care accountable care organizations,
303 one care plans, senior care options plans, the behavioral health vendor or the primary care
304 clinician plan; and (v) 1 member of any other state agency that serves MassHealth beneficiaries,
305 who shall serve as an ex officio, non-voting member.
15 of 32

306 (c) The executive office shall provide the committee with such staff and technical
307 assistance as necessary to enable the committee to make effective recommendations and such
308 financial arrangements as necessary to make possible the participation of recipient members.
309 (d) Annually, not later than October 1, the office of Medicaid shall report to the joint
310 committee on health care financing and the house and senate committees on ways and means on
311 the activities of the MassHealth program advisory committee in the previous fiscal year. The
312 report shall include, but shall not be limited to, the names and titles of committee members, dates
313 of committee meetings, agendas and minutes or notes from such meetings and any
314 correspondence, memorandum, recommendations or other product of the committee’s work.
315 MassHealth member advisory committee members shall have the option to omit their names
316 from the report.
317 SECTION 31. Said chapter 118E is hereby further amended by striking out section 9F, as
318 so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
319 Section 9F. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
320 meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise,:
321 “Dually eligible”, or “dually eligible individual”, a person who is not less than 21 years
322 of age and not more than 65 years of age at the time of enrollment in a dual eligible managed
323 care organization and who is enrolled in both Medicare and MassHealth.
324 “Dual eligible managed care organization”, a comprehensive network of medical, health
325 care and long-term services and supports providers that integrates all components of care, either
326 directly or through subcontracts, and has been contracted with by the executive office to provide
327 services to dually eligible individuals under this section.
16 of 32

328 (b) The secretary of health and human services may establish, subject to appropriation, all
329 required federal approvals and agreements and the availability of federal financial participation,
330 a health care program for dually eligible individuals, aged 21 to 64 at the time of enrollment,
331 who are dually eligible for benefits under MassHealth Standard or CommonHealth and Medicare
332 under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act and who do not have any additional comprehensive
333 health coverage. Under the program, the executive office may contract to provide integrated,
334 comprehensive Medicaid and Medicare services, including medical, behavioral health and long-
335 term support services for a capitated payment.
336 (c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of health and
337 human services may review a request for financial solvency certification by a care delivery
338 organization based in the commonwealth applying to serve as a Medicare plan caring for
339 residents who are dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid. Upon determination that
340 appropriate financial standards, which may be the standards already in place for organizations
341 with contracts pursuant to this section, have been met, the secretary of health and human services
342 shall so certify to the centers for Medicare and Medicaid services. The secretary of health and
343 human services may require the requesting organization to pay a reasonable certification fee.
344 (d) Members of the MassHealth managed care program integrating care for dually
345 eligible individuals shall be provided an independent community care coordinator by the dual
346 eligible managed care organization, who shall be a participant in the member’s care team. The
347 community care coordinator shall assist in the development of a long-term support and services
348 care plan. The community care coordinator shall: (i) participate in initial and ongoing
349 assessments of the health and functional status of the member, including determining
350 appropriateness for long-term care support and services, either in the form of institutional or
17 of 32

351 community-based care plans and related service packages necessary to improve or maintain
352 enrollee health and functional status; (ii) arrange and, with the agreement of the member and the
353 care team, coordinate appropriate institutional and community long-term supports and services,
354 including assistance with the activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living,
355 housing, home-delivered meals, transportation and, under specific conditions or circumstances
356 established by the dual eligible managed care organization, authorize a range and amount of
357 community-based services; and (iii) monitor the appropriate provision and functional outcomes
358 of community long-term care services, according to the service plan as deemed appropriate by
359 the member and the care team, and track member satisfaction and the appropriate provision and
360 functional outcomes of community long-term care services, according to the service plan as
361 deemed appropriate by the member and the care team.
362 (e) The dual eligible managed care organization shall not have a direct or indirect
363 financial ownership interest in an entity that serves as an independent care coordinator. Providers
364 of institutional or community based long-term services and supports on a compensated basis
365 shall not function as an independent care coordinator; provided, however, that the secretary may
366 grant a waiver permitting a provider of institutional or community based long-term services and
367 supports on a compensated basis to function as an independent care coordinator upon a finding
368 that public necessity and convenience require such a waiver. For the purposes of this section, an
369 organization compensated to provide only evaluation, assessment, coordination, skills training,
370 peer support and fiscal intermediary services shall not be considered a provider of long term
371 services and supports.
18 of 32

372 SECTION 32. Section 10H1/2 of said chapter 118E, inserted by section 2 of chapter 388
373 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in
374 place thereof the following paragraph:-
375 The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
376 organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
377 to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage
378 for the treatment of Down syndrome through medically necessary speech therapy, occupational
379 therapy, physical therapy and, for individuals not more than 21 years of age, applied behavior
380 analysis services.
381 SECTION 33. Said chapter 118E is hereby further amended by adding the following
382 section:-
383 Section 87. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive
384 office may directly pay state agencies, including county correctional facilities and department of
385 correction facilities operated by such state agencies, for claims related to Medicaid under Title
386 XIX of the Social Security Act, the Children’s Health Insurance Program under Title XXI of the
387 Social Security Act, the health safety net office under sections 64 to 69, inclusive, the Children’s
388 Medical Security Plan established pursuant to section 10F and other similar healthcare programs;
389 provided, however, that such state agencies meet all applicable conditions of participation in said
390 programs, as determined by the executive office in its sole discretion.
391 SECTION 34. Section 131M of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in section
392 71 of chapter 135 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out subsection (e)
393 and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
19 of 32

394 (e) This section shall not apply to transfer or possession by: (i) a qualified law
395 enforcement officer or a qualified retired law enforcement officer, as defined in the Law
396 Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004, 18 U.S.C. sections 926B and 926C, respectively, as
397 amended; (ii) a law enforcement officer as defined in section 1 of chapter 6E who is currently
398 certified or recertified pursuant to section 4 of said chapter 6E; (iii) a federal, state or local law
399 enforcement agency; or (iv) a federally licensed manufacturer solely for sale or transfer in
400 another state or for export.
401 SECTION 35. Section 29 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
402 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 6, the figure “$25,000” and inserting
403 in place thereof the following figure:- $50,000.
404 SECTION 36. Section 44A of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
405 striking out, in lines 61, 80, 84 and 100, the figure “$50,000” and inserting in place thereof, in
406 each instance, the following figure:- $75,000.
407 SECTION 37. Said section 44A of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby further
408 amended by striking out, in lines 101 and 112, the figure “$150,000” and inserting in place
409 thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- $250,000.
410 SECTION 38. Section 44F of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
411 striking out, in lines 6 and 42, the figure “$25,000” and inserting in place thereof, in each
412 instance, the following figure:- $50,000.
413 SECTION 39. The second paragraph of subsection (j) of section 10 of chapter 269 of the
414 General Laws, as most recently amended by section 123 of chapter 135 of the acts of 2024, is
415 hereby further amended by striking out the words “or a qualified retired law enforcement officer,
20 of 32

416 as defined in the Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004, 18 U.S.C. sections 926B and
417 926C, respectively, as amended” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- , a qualified
418 retired law enforcement officer, as defined in the Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004,
419 18 U.S.C. sections 926B and 926C, respectively, as amended or a law enforcement officer as
420 defined in section 1 of chapter 6E who is currently certified or recertified pursuant to section 4 of
421 said chapter 6E.
422 SECTION 40. Subsection (k) of said section 10 of said chapter 269, inserted by section
423 124 of said chapter 135, is hereby amended by striking out paragraph (5) and inserting in place
424 thereof the following paragraph:-
425 (5) This subsection shall not apply to a law enforcement officer as defined in section 1 of
426 chapter 6E who is currently certified or recertified pursuant to section 4 of said chapter 6E, a
427 qualified law enforcement officer or a qualified retired law enforcement officer as defined in the
428 Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004, 18 U.S.C. sections 926B and 926C, respectively,
429 as amended or to a security guard employed at the prohibited area while at the location of their
430 employment and during the course of their employment. Nothing in this paragraph shall limit the
431 authority of any municipality, county or department, division, commission, board, agency or
432 court of the commonwealth to adopt policies further restricting the possession of firearms in
433 areas under their control.
434 SECTION 41. Subsection (d) of section 81 of chapter 179 of the acts of 2022 is hereby
435 amended by striking out paragraphs (5) and (6), as appearing in section 103 of chapter 239 of the
436 acts of 2024, and inserting in place thereof the following 2 paragraphs:-
21 of 32

437 (5) Not later than 12 months after the completion of each assessment, each electric
438 distribution company may submit to the department of public utilities its plan and an application
439 to revise its rates to account for the additional distribution infrastructure included in the plan
440 pursuant to paragraph (4). The application shall include: (i) testimony that explains how the
441 application is consistent with the plan pursuant to said paragraph (4); (ii) an explanation of the
442 need for each distribution infrastructure investment; (iii) supporting documentation
443 demonstrating that the actual or estimated costs for each distribution infrastructure investment
444 are reasonable; and (iv) the actual or estimated in-service date of the distribution infrastructure
445 investment. Such application shall be preliminarily approved by the department of public utilities
446 not later than 6 months after submission; provided, however, that the requested rate revision is
447 consistent with the department's practices and incremental costs are not otherwise accounted for
448 in the electric distribution company's existing rates. The department's review of such application
449 shall not be construed as a prudence review. The electric distribution company's application shall
450 be deemed approved if the department does not act within 6 months after the application is
451 submitted.
452 (6) The department of public utilities shall review the additional distribution
453 infrastructure investments planned pursuant to paragraph (4) during the next general rate case of
454 the electric distribution company. Each electric distribution company shall be entitled to cost
455 recovery of such infrastructure investments where the electric distribution company
456 demonstrates: (i) how it evaluated advanced transmission technologies, energy storage, other
457 infrastructure investments and alternatives other than infrastructure investments to satisfy
458 projected demand; (ii) that the proposed infrastructure investments were cost effective compared
459 with the alternatives, provide net benefits for customers and meet the criteria enumerated in
22 of 32

460 clauses (i) to (vi), inclusive, of subsection (a) of said section 92B of said chapter 164; and (iii)
461 that the expenses are incremental to the costs already recovered through base distribution rates or
462 recovered through reconciling mechanisms. The department may, as necessary, require
463 customers to be credited for any change in rates made pursuant to paragraph (5) with interest.
464 SECTION 42. Item 0910-0210 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
465 amended by adding the following words:- ; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
466 special law to the contrary, funds may be collected in the prior fiscal year for service programs or
467 activities delivered during the next fiscal year; and provided further, that any unspent balance at
468 the close of the current fiscal year up to the limit established under this item shall remain in the
469 account and may be expended for the purposes of this item in the following fiscal year.
470 SECTION 43. Item 4513-1012 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
471 by striking out the figure “$27,400,000”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in
472 each instance, the following figure:- $27,800,000.
473 SECTION 44. Item 4590-0912 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
474 by striking out the figure “$27,995,640”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in
475 each instance, the following figure:- $29,195,640.
476 SECTION 45. Item 8100-0006 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
477 by striking out the figure “$37,250,000”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in
478 each instance, the following figure:- $45,000,000.
479 SECTION 46. Item 9110-1630 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
480 by adding the following words:- ; and provided further, that the secretary of aging and
481 independence may transfer funds between items 9110-0600, 9110-1630 and 9110-1633.
23 of 32

482 SECTION 47. Item 1595-1068 of section 2E of said chapter 140, as most recently
483 amended by section 128 of chapter 248 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking
484 out the figure “$444,250,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $539,980,000.
485 SECTION 48. Said item 1595-1068 of said section 2E of said chapter 140, as so
486 amended, is hereby further amended by striking out the figure “$837,827,000” and inserting in
487 place thereof the following figure:- $972,235,420.
488 SECTION 49. Section 217 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended by striking out the
489 figure “2025” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2026.
490 SECTION 50. Subsection (d) of section 126 of chapter 150 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
491 amended by striking out the words “June 30” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
492 December 31.
493 SECTION 51. The first sentence of section 293 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 is
494 hereby amended by striking out, each time they appear, the words “and officers”.
495 SECTION 52. Section 304 of said chapter 238 is hereby amended by striking out the
496 word “agriculture” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- public health.
497 SECTION 53. Said section 304 of said chapter 238 is hereby further amended by striking
498 out the figure “2025” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2026.
499 SECTION 54. Chapter 239 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by striking out section
500 65 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
24 of 32

501 Section 65. Said section 69J of said chapter 164, as so appearing, is hereby further
502 amended by striking out the third paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
503 paragraph:-
504 A petition to construct a facility shall include, in such form and detail as the board shall
505 from time to time prescribe: (i) a description of the facility, site and surrounding areas; (ii) an
506 analysis of the need for the facility, either within or outside, or both within and outside the
507 commonwealth, including a description of the energy benefits of the facility; (iii) a description of
508 the alternatives to the facility, such as other methods of transmitting or storing energy, other site
509 locations, other sources of electrical power or gas or a reduction of requirements through load
510 management; (iv) a description of the environmental impacts of the facility, including both
511 environmental benefits and burdens, that includes a description of efforts to avoid, minimize and
512 mitigate burdens and efforts to enhance benefits, such as shared use, recreational paths or access
513 to nature; (v) evidence that all pre-filing consultation and community engagement requirements
514 established by the board have been satisfied and, if not, the applicant shall demonstrate good
515 cause for a waiver of the requirements that could not be satisfied by the applicant; and (vi) a
516 cumulative impact analysis. The board may issue and revise filing guidelines after public notice
517 and a period for comment. Said filing guidelines shall require the applicant to provide minimum
518 data for review related to climate change impact, land use impact, water resource impact, air
519 quality impact, fire and other public safety risks, solid waste impact, radiation impact, noise
520 impact and other public health impacts as determined by the board.
521 SECTION 55. Clause (v) of subsection (b) of section 118 of said chapter 239 is hereby
522 amended by striking out the words “generating facility” and inserting in place thereof the
523 following words:- energy storage system.
25 of 32

524 SECTION 56. Section 129 of said chapter 239 is hereby amended by striking out the
525 figure “133” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 132.
526 SECTION 57. Item 3000-1142 of section 2A of chapter 248 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
527 amended by striking out the word “between” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
528 from this item to.
529 SECTION 58. Chapter 390 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by striking out the
530 words “public way within 3 miles of the vessel’s waterfront location of origin in the town of
531 Barnstable and which may pass over the roadways of the town of Yarmouth; provided, however,
532 that said vessel shall be trucked by a professional licensed boat hauler” and inserting in place
533 thereof the following words:- locally owned or controlled public way within 3 miles of the
534 vessel’s waterfront location of origin in the city known as the town of Barnstable and which may
535 pass over the locally owned or controlled roadways of the town of Yarmouth; provided,
536 however, that said vessel shall be trucked by a professional licensed boat hauler; provided
537 further, that for the purposes of this section, public ways shall not include roadways owned or
538 within the control of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
539 SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, sections 88
540 and 94 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 and section 21 shall only apply to land purchased or
541 taken under a tax title on or after November 1, 2024.
542 SECTION 60. Notwithstanding sections 185A to 185E, inclusive, of chapter 140 of the
543 General Laws, no person shall be required to be licensed to engage in the business of selling
544 tickets or the business of reselling or facilitating a mechanism for 2 or more parties to participate
26 of 32

545 in the resale of any ticket of admission under said section 185A of said chapter 140 until January
546 1, 2026.
547 SECTION 61. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
548 comptroller shall transfer all funds currently in the inspector general expendable trust to the
549 Office of the Inspector General Recovery Fund established in section 2KKKKKK of chapter 29
550 of the General Laws not later than 90 days from the effective date of this act.
551 SECTION 62. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any
552 unexpended balances, not to exceed a total of $40,000,000, in items 4000-0700 and 4000-1426
553 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 shall not revert to the General Fund until
554 September 1, 2025 and may be expended by the executive office of health and human services to
555 pay for services enumerated in said items 4000-0700 and 4000-1426 of said section 2 of said
556 chapter 140 provided during fiscal year 2025.
557 SECTION 63. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
558 2025, the secretary of health and human services may, with the written approval of the secretary
559 of administration and finance, authorize transfers of surplus among items 4000-0320, 4000-0430,
560 4000-0500, 4000-0601, 4000-0641, 4000-0700, 4000-0875, 4000-0880, 4000-0885, 4000-0940,
561 4000-0950, 4000-0990, 4000-1400, 4000-1420 and 4000-1426.
562 SECTION 64. Notwithstanding the terms of any prior appropriation or any other general
563 or special law to the contrary, any unexpended funds appropriated to and held by the
564 Massachusetts Growth Capital Corporation shall be transferred to and expended by the
565 Massachusetts Development Finance Agency to ensure post-merger continuity of the agency’s
566 programs.
27 of 32

567 SECTION 65. (a) There shall be a Health Safety Net Trust Fund task force to consider
568 the funding and administration of the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of
569 chapter 118E of the General Laws and administered pursuant to section 65 of said chapter 118E.
570 The task force shall consist of: the assistant secretary for MassHealth or a designee, who shall
571 serve as chair; the secretary of administration and finance or a designee; the commissioner of
572 insurance or a designee; the executive director of the commonwealth connector or a designee; the
573 senate and house chairs of the joint committee on health care financing; a representative from the
574 Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association, Inc.; a representative from the Massachusetts
575 Association of Health Plans, Inc.; a representative from Blue Cross Blue Shield of
576 Massachusetts, Inc.; a representative from the Conference of Boston Teaching Hospitals, Inc.; 3
577 representatives, as determined by the division of medical assistance, that represent a hospital in
578 each of the eastern, central and western Massachusetts regions with the greatest amount of health
579 safety net disbursements in the most recent year of data; 2 representatives from the
580 Massachusetts League of Community Health Centers, Inc.; a representative from the
581 Massachusetts Taxpayers Foundation, Inc.; and a representative from Health Care For All, Inc.
582 (b) The task force shall review and make recommendations on the funding and
583 administration of the Health Safety Net Trust Fund, including, but not limited to: (i) the
584 reimbursement model for acute hospitals and community health centers for reimbursable health
585 services provided to low-income, uninsured or underinsured residents; (ii) improving the long-
586 term sustainability of the Health Safety Net Trust Fund; (iii) increasing the financial solvency of
587 community health centers and acute hospitals delivering reimbursable health services to low-
588 income, uninsured or underinsured residents; (iv) the scope of health services and
589 pharmaceutical drugs that are eligible for reimbursement; (v) acute hospital eligibility criteria for
28 of 32

590 reimbursable health services; (vi) the impacts of federal statutory and regulatory changes on
591 health safety net programming; and (vii) expanding the enrollment of uninsured individuals who
592 receive health services reimbursed by said fund into health care plans and programs.
593 (c) Not later than April 1, 2026, the task force shall submit a report and recommendations
594 to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the joint committee on health care
595 financing and the house and senate committees on ways and means.
596 SECTION 66. The special commission established in section 149 of chapter 135 of the
597 acts of 2024 is hereby revived and continued and shall file its final report not later than
598 December 31, 2025.
599 SECTION 67. The special commission established in section 202 of chapter 140 of the
600 acts of 2024 is hereby revived and continued and shall file its final report not later than October
601 15, 2025.
602 SECTION 68. The special commission established in section 150 of chapter 178 of the
603 acts of 2024 is hereby revived and continued and shall file its final report not later than
604 December 31, 2025.
605 SECTION 69. The special commission established in section 152 of chapter 178 of the
606 acts of 2024 is hereby revived and continued and shall file its final report not later than
607 December 31, 2025.
608 SECTION 70. The task force established in section 5 of chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is
609 hereby revived and continued and shall file its final report not later than November 15, 2025.
29 of 32

610 SECTION 71. The salary adjustments and other economic benefits authorized by the
611 following collective bargaining agreements shall be effective for the purposes of section 7 of
612 chapter 150E of the General Laws:
613 (1) the agreement between the Sheriff of Bristol County and the National Correctional
614 Employees' Union, Local 103 (K-9 Unit), Unit SA7, effective from July 1, 2024 through June
615 30, 2027;
616 (2) the agreement between the Board of Trustees of the University of Massachusetts and
617 Service Employees International Union, Local 888, Unit L95, effective from July 1, 2024
618 through June 30, 2027;
619 (3) the agreement between the Secretary of the Commonwealth and Service Employees
620 International Union, Local 888 AFL/CIO on behalf of certain employees of the Suffolk Registry
621 of Deeds, Unit SC2, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
622 (4) the agreement between the Sheriff of Bristol County and the National Correctional
623 Employees' Union, Local 103 (K-9 Unit), Unit SA7, effective from July 1, 2024 through June
624 30, 2027;
625 (5) the agreement between the Sheriff of Plymouth County and the New England Police
626 Benevolent Association (NEPBA), Local 580 (BCI), Unit SP3, effective from July 1, 2024
627 through June 30, 2027;
628 (6) the agreement between the Sheriff of Norfolk County and the National Association of
629 Government Employees, RI Local 202, Unit SN1, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
630 2027;
30 of 32

631 (7) the agreement between the Sheriff of Norfolk County and the County Correctional
632 Officers Association, NEPBA Local 570, Unit SN3, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
633 2027;
634 (8) the agreement between the Board of Higher Education and the Association of
635 Professional Administrators, MTA/NEA, Unit APA, effective from July 1, 2024 through June
636 30, 2027;
637 (9) the agreement between the Sheriff of Norfolk County and the County Correctional
638 Officers Association, NEPBA Local 575, Unit SN2, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
639 2027;
640 (10) the agreement between the Sheriff of Hampshire County and the Hampshire Sheriff's
641 Office Treatment Association (SOTA), Unit SH6, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
642 2027;
643 (11) the agreement between the Sheriff of Hampshire County and the Hampshire
644 Sheriff’s Office Jail and House of Correction Supervisory Correctional Officers, Unit SH8,
645 effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
646 (12) the agreement between the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and the New England
647 Police Benevolent Association (NEPBA), Unit 4A, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
648 2027;
649 (13) the agreement between the Sheriff of Barnstable County and NAGE-IBCO, Local
650 217, Unit S3B, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
31 of 32

651 (14) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the American
652 Federation of State, County and Municipal Employees, Council 93, Local 1776, AFL-CIO, Unit
653 A01, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
654 (15) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the American
655 Federation of State, County and Municipal Employees, Local 507/Council 93, AFL-CIO, Unit
656 D82, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
657 (16) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the New England Police
658 Benevolent Association (NEPBA), Local 290, Unit B33, effective from July 1, 2024 through
659 June 30, 2027;
660 (17) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the New England Police
661 Benevolent Association (NEPBA), Local 285, Unit B3S, effective from July 1, 2024 through
662 June 30, 2027;
663 (18) the agreement between the Sheriff of Hampshire County and the Hampshire County
664 Sheriff’s Office Non-Uniform Correctional Association, Unit SH7, effective from July 1, 2024
665 through June 30, 2027;
666 (19) the agreement between the Sheriff of Plymouth County and the New England Police
667 Benevolent Association (NEPBA), Local 193, Unit SP5, effective from July 1, 2024 through
668 June 30, 2027; and
669 (20) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the Massachusetts
670 Society of Professors, MTA/NEA, Unit A50, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027.
32 of 32